Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8020. POLK COUNTY FRESH WATER SUPPLY DISTRICT NO. 2

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8020.0001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Polk County Fresh Water Supply District No. 2.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8020.0002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal utility district converted from a fresh water supply district by Chapter 814, Acts of the 75th Legislature, Regular Session, 1997.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8020.0003. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district's boundaries are those confirmed by Section 3, Chapter 814, Acts of the 75th Legislature, Regular Session, 1997, as those boundaries may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The confirmation of boundaries described by Subsection (a):

(1) does not enlarge or diminish the district as it existed on September 1, 1997; and

(2) includes the property in the district that was being served or taxed on September 1, 1997.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8020.0004. DISTRICT NAME CHANGE. The district's board of directors may change the name of the district in an open meeting for which proper notice has been given.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8020.0051. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the district has the rights, powers, privileges, and functions conferred by Chapter 54, Water Code.

(b) The district may not exercise any authority with regard to firefighting or to municipal solid waste disposal.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.